Alabama, session 2026rs, HB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the City of Loxley in Baldwin County are altered, rearranged,
and extended to include within the corporate limits of the
municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
the following territory:
I. Bertolla Property Legislative Annexation
Area 1: Intending to describe Parcel ID
05-42-01-12-0-000-013.000
Commencing at a 3/4" open top iron being the Southwest
corner of Section 12, Township 5 South, Range 3 East, Baldwin
County, Alabama; thence run North 00°11'56" East, 29.73 feet
to a point thence run North 89°59'33" East, 20.00 feet to a
HMR capped rebar being the intersection of the East
right-of-way of Cabinet Shop Road and the North right-of-way
of County Highway 64 and the POINT OF BEGINNING; thence run
North 00°11'56" East along said East right-of-way of Cabinet
Shop Road, 1332.25 feet to a HMR capped rebar; thence run
North 89°48'04" West, 20.00 feet to a capped rebar (10675);
Page 1

North 89°48'04" West, 20.00 feet to a capped rebar (10675);
HB211 INTRODUCED
thence run North 00°12'09" East, 969.36 feet to a 1" open top
iron; thence run North 89°55'56" East, 1866.56 feet to a
capped rebar (10675); thence run South 00°49'07" East, 1006.07
feet to a capped rebar; thence run North 89°40'27" East, 77.22
feet to a HMR capped rebar; thence run South 00°08'46" West,
1298.07 feet to a HMR capped rebar being a point on said North
right-of-way of County Highway 64; thence run South 89°59'33"
West along said North right-of-way of County Highway 64,
1962.89 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 101.12
acres, more or less.
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of Loxley
is on file and open to public inspection in the office of the
Judge of Probate in Baldwin County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2